zh-TW: 遊戲難度: 困難; 簡單; 媒介; 其他
cs: Obtížnost hry: Obtížné; Snadné; Médium; Jiné
hr-HR: Težina igre: Teško; Lako; Srednje; Ostalo
zh-CN: 游戏难度: 困难; 简单; 媒介; 其他
ro-RO: Dificultate joc: Dificil; Ușor; Mediu; Altele
pt-PT: Dificuldade do jogo: Difícil; Fácil; Médio; Outro
en: Game difficulty: Difficult; Easy; Medium; Other
nl: Moeilijkheidsgraad spel: Moeilijk; Eenvoudig; Medium; Andere
it: Difficoltà del gioco: Difficile; Facile; Medium; Altro
ru: Сложность игры: Сложно; Легко; Средний; Другой
lt-LT: Žaidimo sudėtingumas: Sunkus; Lengvas; Vidutiniškas; Kita
nb: Spillvanskelighet: Vanskelig; Lett; Middels; Annet
tr: Oyun zorluk seviyesi: Zor; Kolay; Orta; Diğer
da: Spillets sværhedsgrad: Svær; Nem; Medium; Andet
bg-BG: Трудност на играта: Трудно; Лесно; Средно; Други
hu: A játék nehézsége: Nehéz; Könnyű; Közepes; Egyéb
th: ความยากของเกม: ยาก; ง่าย; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Dificuldade do jogo: Difícil; Fácil; Médio; Outro
fr: Difficulté du jeu: Difficile; Facile; Moyen; Autre
ko: 게임 난이도: 어려움; 쉬움; 매체; 기타
pl: Trudność gry: Trudny; Łatwo; Środek; Inne
ja: ゲームの難易度: 難しい; 簡単; 媒体; その他
sk-SK: Obtiažnosť hry: Ťažký; Ľahký; Stredný; Iné
de: Schwierigkeit des Spiels: Schwierig; Einfach; Medium; Sonstiges
vi: Độ khó của trò chơi: Khó; Dễ; Vừa; Khác
sl-SI: Težavnost igre: Težko; Enostavno; Srednja; Drugo
fi: Pelin vaikeusaste: Vaikea; Helppo; Keskimääräinen; Muu
es: Dificultad del juego: Difícil; Fácil; Medio; Otros
sv: Spelsvårighet: Svår; Lätt; Medium; Övrigt
el: Δυσκολία παιχνιδιού: Δύσκολο; Εύκολο; Μέση; Άλλο